Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.757

Public corporations—Statutes to be construed consistent with state Constitution.

Nothing in RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755 shall be construed in any manner contrary to the provisions of Article VIII, section 7, of the Washington state Constitution.

[ 1985 c 332 s 6.]